Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of  this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 441.015 to
441.119.
SECTION 2. The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt rules and procedures to  allow a
hospital to apply for a license as a rural emergency hospital as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1395x.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House February 27, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 4, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4047 (HB 4047-INTRO) Page 1